Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1801
Pathogenic microorganisms; sale and distribution; permit required.

The sale and distribution of any material or substance, containing live microorganisms which are pathogenic to humans, is hereby prohibited unless authorized by special permits as provided for by sections 71-1802 and 71-1803.

Laws 1943, c. 153, § 1, p. 561;

R.S.1943, § 71-1801.